Rhode Island, session 2025, HB5284.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 31-10-31 of the General Laws in Chapter 31-10 entitled "Operators’
and Chauffeurs’ Licenses" is hereby amended to read as follows:
31-10-31. Fees.
(a) Except as provided in subsection (b) of this section, the The following fees shall be paid
to the division of motor vehicles:
(1) For every operator’s first license to operate a motor vehicle, twenty-five dollars
($25.00);
(2) For every chauffeur’s first license, twenty-five dollars ($25.00); provided, that when a
Rhode Island licensed operator transfers to a chauffeur’s license, the fee for the transfer shall be
two dollars ($2.00);
(3) [Deleted by P.L. 2024, ch. 41, § 1 and P.L. 2024, ch. 42, § 1.]
(4) For every operator’s first license to operate a motorcycle, fifty dollars ($50.00);
(5) For every renewal of an operator’s or chauffeur’s license, thirty dollars ($30.00); with
the exception of any person seventy-five (75) years of age or older for whom the renewal fee will
be eight dollars ($8.00);
(6) For every duplicate operator’s or chauffeur’s license and every routine information
update, i.e., name change or address change, twenty-five dollars ($25.00);
(7) For every certified copy of any license, permit, or application issued under this chapter,

ten dollars ($10.00);
(8) For every duplicate instruction permit, ten dollars ($10.00);
(9) For every first license examination, five dollars ($5.00);
(10) For surrender of an out-of-state license, in addition to the above fees, five dollars
($5.00).
(b) Any person provided or receiving foster caregiving in foster and adoptive homes as
defined in § 42-72.1-2 shall upon reaching an age when the person is no longer defined as a child
pursuant to § 42-72.1-2, be exempt from payment of the fee stated in subsection (a)(1) of this
section. The fee waiver shall remain in effect until the individual reaches twenty-seven (27) years
of age.
(c) Any person eligible for the fee waiver in subsection (b) of this section shall also be
eligible for a fee waiver for driver's education classes at the Community College of Rhode Island
required by § 31-10-19(e).
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC000189
========
LC000189 - Page 2 of 3